Florida, session 2026, SB1608.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âSubsection (1) of section 193.155, Florida 12 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (4) of that section is 13 republished, to read: 14 193.155âHomestead assessments.âHomestead property shall be 15 assessed at just value as of January 1, 1994. Property receiving 16 the homestead exemption after January 1, 1994, shall be assessed 17 at just value as of January 1 of the year in which the property 18 receives the exemption unless the provisions of subsection (8) 19 apply. 20 (1)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (b) and subsection 21 (4), beginning in 1995, or the year following the year the 22 property receives homestead exemption, whichever is later, the 23 property shall be reassessed annually on January 1. Any change 24 resulting from such reassessment shall not exceed the lower of 25 the following: 26 1.(a)âThree percent of the assessed value of the property 27 for the prior year; or 28 2.(b)âThe percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for 29 All Urban Consumers, U.S. City Average, all items 1967=100, or 30 successor reports for the preceding calendar year as initially 31 reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of 32 Labor Statistics. 33 (b)âExcept as provided in subsection (4), the assessed 34 value of homestead property may not increase if the just value 35 of the property is less than the just value of the property on 36 the preceding January 1. 37 (4)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (b) and s. 193.624, 38 changes, additions, or improvements to homestead property shall 39 be assessed at just value as of the first January 1 after the 40 changes, additions, or improvements are substantially completed. 41 (b)1.âChanges, additions, or improvements that replace all 42 or a portion of homestead property, including ancillary 43 improvements, damaged or destroyed by misfortune or calamity 44 shall be assessed upon substantial completion as provided in 45 this paragraph. Such assessment must be calculated using the 46 homestead propertyâs assessed value as of the January 1 47 immediately before the date on which the damage or destruction 48 was sustained, subject to the assessment limitations in 49 subsections (1) and (2), when: 50 a.âThe square footage of the homestead property as changed 51 or improved does not exceed 130 percent of the square footage of 52 the homestead property before the damage or destruction; or 53 b.âThe total square footage of the homestead property as 54 changed or improved does not exceed 2,000 square feet. 55 2.âThe homestead propertyâs assessed value must be 56 increased by the just value of that portion of the changed or 57 improved homestead property which is in excess of 130 percent of 58 the square footage of the homestead property before the damage 59 or destruction or of that portion exceeding 2,000 square feet. 60 3.âHomestead property damaged or destroyed by misfortune or 61 calamity which, after being changed or improved, has a square 62 footage of less than 100 percent of the homestead propertyâs 63 total square footage before the damage or destruction shall be 64 assessed pursuant to subsection (5). 65 4.âChanges, additions, or improvements assessed pursuant to 66 this paragraph must be reassessed pursuant to subsection (1) in 67 subsequent years. This paragraph applies to changes, additions, 68 or improvements commenced within 5 years after the January 1 69 following the damage or destruction of the homestead. 70 (c)âChanges, additions, or improvements that replace all or 71 a portion of real property that was damaged or destroyed by 72 misfortune or calamity shall be assessed upon substantial 73 completion as if such damage or destruction had not occurred and 74 in accordance with paragraph (b) if the owner of such property: 75 1.âWas permanently residing on such property when the 76 damage or destruction occurred; 77 2.âWas not entitled to receive homestead exemption on such 78 property as of January 1 of that year; and 79 3.âApplies for and receives homestead exemption on such 80 property the following year. 81 (d)âChanges, additions, or improvements include 82 improvements made to common areas or other improvements made to 83 property other than to the homestead property by the owner or by 84 an owner association, which improvements directly benefit the 85 homestead property. Such changes, additions, or improvements 86 shall be assessed at just value, and the just value shall be 87 apportioned among the parcels benefiting from the improvement. 88 Section 2.âSubsection (3) of section 193.1554, Florida 89 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (6) of that section is 90 republished, to read: 91 193.1554âAssessment of nonhomestead residential property.â 92 (3)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (b) and subsection 93 (6), beginning in the year following the year the nonhomestead 94 residential property becomes eligible for assessment pursuant to 95 this section, the property shall be reassessed annually on 96 January 1. Any change resulting from such reassessment may not 97 exceed 10 percent of the assessed value of the property for the 98 prior year. 99 (b)âExcept for assessments described in subsection (6), for 100 all levies other than school district levies, the assessed value 101 of a nonhomestead residential property may not increase if the 102 just value of the property is less than the just value of the 103 property on the preceding January 1. 104 (6)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (b) and s. 193.624, 105 changes, additions, or improvements to nonhomestead residential 106 property shall be assessed at just value as of the first January 107 1 after the changes, additions, or improvements are 108 substantially completed. 109 (b)1.âChanges, additions, or improvements that replace all 110 or a portion of nonhomestead residential property, including 111 ancillary improvements, damaged or destroyed by misfortune or 112 calamity must be assessed upon substantial completion as 113 provided in this paragraph. Such assessment must be calculated 114 using the nonhomestead propertyâs assessed value as of the 115 January 1 immediately before the date on which the damage or 116 destruction was sustained, subject to the assessment limitations 117 in subsections (3) and (4), when: 118 a.âThe square footage of the property as changed or 119 improved does not exceed 110 percent of the square footage of 120 the property before the damage or destruction; or 121 b.âThe total square footage of the property as changed or 122 improved does not exceed 1,500 square feet. 123 2.âThe propertyâs assessed value must be increased by the 124 just value of that portion of the changed or improved property 125 which is in excess of 110 percent of the square footage of the 126 property before the damage or destruction or of that portion 127 exceeding 1,500 square feet. 128 3.âProperty damaged or destroyed by misfortune or calamity 129 which, after being changed or improved, has a square footage of 130 less than 100 percent of the propertyâs total square footage 131 before the damage or destruction shall be assessed pursuant to 132 subsection (8). 133 4.âChanges, additions, or improvements assessed pursuant to 134 this paragraph shall be reassessed pursuant to subsection (3) in 135 subsequent years. This paragraph applies to changes, additions, 136 or improvements commenced within 3 years after the January 1 137 following the damage or destruction of the property. 138 (c)âChanges, additions, or improvements include 139 improvements made to common areas or other improvements made to 140 property other than to the nonhomestead residential property by 141 the owner or by an owner association, which improvements 142 directly benefit the property. Such changes, additions, or 143 improvements shall be assessed at just value, and the just value 144 shall be apportioned among the parcels benefiting from the 145 improvement. 146 Section 3.âSubsection (3) of section 193.1555, Florida 147 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (6) of that section is 148 republished, to read: 149 193.1555âAssessment of certain residential and 150 nonresidential real property.â 151 (3)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (b), beginning in 152 the year following the year the property becomes eligible for 153 assessment pursuant to this section, the property shall be 154 reassessed annually on January 1. Any change resulting from such 155 reassessment may not exceed 10 percent of the assessed value of 156 the property for the prior year. 157 (b)âExcept for assessments described in subsection (6), for 158 all levies other than school district levies, the assessed value 159 of nonresidential real property may not increase if the just 160 value of the property is less than the just value of the 161 property on the preceding January 1. 162 (6)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (b), changes, 163 additions, or improvements to nonresidential real property shall 164 be assessed at just value as of the first January 1 after the 165 changes, additions, or improvements are substantially completed. 166 (b)1.âChanges, additions, or improvements that replace all 167 or a portion of nonresidential real property, including 168 ancillary improvements, damaged or destroyed by misfortune or 169 calamity must be assessed upon substantial completion as 170 provided in this paragraph. Such assessment must be calculated 171 using the nonresidential real propertyâs assessed value as of 172 the January 1 immediately before the date on which the damage or 173 destruction was sustained, subject to the assessment limitations 174 in subsections (3) and (4), when: 175 a.âThe square footage of the property as changed or 176 improved does not exceed 110 percent of the square footage of 177 the property before the damage or destruction; and 178 b.âThe changes, additions, or improvements do not change 179 the propertyâs character or use. 180 2.âThe propertyâs assessed value must be increased by the 181 just value of that portion of the changed or improved property 182 which is in excess of 110 percent of the square footage of the 183 property before the damage or destruction. 184 3.âProperty damaged or destroyed by misfortune or calamity 185 which, after being changed or improved, has a square footage of 186 less than 100 percent of the propertyâs total square footage 187 before the damage or destruction shall be assessed pursuant to 188 subsection (8). 189 4.âChanges, additions, or improvements assessed pursuant to 190 this paragraph must be reassessed pursuant to subsection (3) in 191 subsequent years. This paragraph applies to changes, additions, 192 or improvements commenced within 3 years after the January 1 193 following the damage or destruction of the property. 194 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect on the effective date 195 of the amendment to the State Constitution proposed by SJR ____ 196 or a similar joint resolution having substantially the same 197 specific intent and purpose, if such amendment to the State 198 Constitution is approved at the next general election or at an 199 earlier special election specifically authorized by law for that 200 purpose.